California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “authorized licensee” means a licensee that holds an on-sale beer license, an on-sale beer and wine license for a bona fide public eating place, an on-sale beer and wine for public premises license, an on-sale general license for a bona fide eating place, a club license, a veterans’ club license, an on-sale general brew pub license, an on-sale general license for public premises, a beer manufacturer’s license, or a small beer manufacturer’s license.

(c) (1) Beer or wine produced pursuant to this section may be donated to a nonprofit
 organization for sale at fundraising events conducted solely by and for the benefit of the nonprofit organization. Beer and wine donated pursuant to this subdivision may be sold by the nonprofit organization only for consumption on the premises of the fundraising event, under a license issued by the department to the nonprofit organization pursuant to this division.

(2) Beer or wine donated and sold pursuant to this subdivision shall bear a label identifying its producer and stating that the beer or wine is homemade and not available for sale or for consumption off the licensed premises. The beer or wine is not required to comply with other labeling requirements under this division. However, nothing in this paragraph authorizes the use of any false or misleading information on a beer or wine label.

(3) A nonprofit organization established for the purpose of promoting home
 production of beer or wine, or whose membership is composed primarily of home brewers or home winemakers, shall not be eligible to sell beer pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) A nonprofit organization established for the purpose of promoting home production of beer shall be eligible to serve beer at a fundraising event conducted solely for the benefit of the nonprofit organization pursuant to this subdivision, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The beer that is served is donated by home brewers.

(2) The nonprofit organization shall be issued no more than two permits per calendar year for the serving of beer pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) The nonprofit organization shall display a printed notice at the event that states that home brewed beer is
 not a regulated product subject to health and safety standards.

(4) The event shall have an educational component that includes instruction on the subject of beer, including, but not limited to, the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, the use of beer lists, and the methods of presenting and serving beer.

(5) Only bona fide members of the nonprofit organization may attend the event.

(6) The nonprofit organization shall not solicit or sign up individuals to be members of the nonprofit organization on the day of the event at the event premises.

(7) The nonprofit organization shall provide the department with the number of members that have registered for the event and the estimated number that will be in attendance, 48 hours before the
 event. This paragraph shall apply only if more than 50 members are expected to be in attendance at the event.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this section does not authorize the sale or offering for sale by any person of any beer or wine produced pursuant to this section.

(f) Except as provided herein, nothing in this section authorizes any activity in violation of Section 23300, 23355, or 23399.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 565, Sec. 1.   (AB 2172)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an out-of-state winegrower, after notification to, and approved by, the department, may furnish American wine which the winegrower produces and bottles for wine tastings sponsored by a private nonprofit organization. This privilege shall be extended to winegrowers in those states which accord California winegrowers a substantially equal reciprocal wine tasting privilege. Certification by an appropriate state official of his or her state’s reciprocal wine tasting privilege shall be included with the required notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.5.

A wine blender’s license authorizes the person to whom issued to exercise all of the privileges of a winegrower’s license except:

(a) To crush and ferment and produce wine from grapes, berries or other fruits.

(b) To obtain or be issued a duplicate winegrower’s license as provided for in Section 23390.

(c) To buy, sell, receive or deliver wine from persons other than authorized licensees.

(d) To sell and deliver wine
 to consumers for consumption off the premises where sold.

(e) To exercise on-sale privileges as provided in Section 23358 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.6.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, all provisions in this division pertaining to winegrowers, or to directors, officers, agents and employees of winegrowers, shall apply to wine blenders and to directors, officers, agents and employees of wine blenders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.7.

Nothing in this division shall be or be construed to be retroactive or to affect the rights of a person holding a winegrower’s license or licenses or winegrower’s duplicate license or licenses at the time this section becomes effective, or to prohibit the renewal or transfer of such existing license or licenses from one person to another person or from one premise to another premise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.8.

A licensed wine blender shall not be issued and shall not own or hold, directly or indirectly, any retailer’s license, nor shall the holder of a retailer’s license be issued or own or hold, directly or indirectly, a wine blender’s license, or own or hold any interest in a wine blender’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 463, Sec. 3.   (AB 1425)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.9.

A wine blender’s license does not authorize winetasting activities or the conducting or sponsoring of wine tastings either on or off the wine blender’s licensed premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 463, Sec. 4.   (AB 1425)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23357.

(a) A licensed beer manufacturer may, at the licensed premises of production, sell to consumers for consumption off the premises beer that is produced and bottled by, or produced and packaged for, that manufacturer. Licensed beer manufacturers may also exercise any of the following privileges:

(1) Sell that beer to any person holding a license authorizing the sale of beer.

(2) Sell that beer to consumers for consumption on the manufacturer’s licensed premises or on premises owned by the manufacturer that are contiguous to the licensed premises and which are operated by and for the manufacturer.

(3) Sell beer and wine, regardless of source, to consumers for consumption at a bona fide public eating place on the manufacturer’s licensed premises or at a bona fide public eating place on premises owned by the manufacturer which are contiguous to the licensed premises and which are operated by and for the manufacturer.

(4) (A) Permit consumers to leave the premises with open containers of alcoholic beverages for consumption off the premises within an entertainment zone if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(i) The premises is located within the entertainment zone.

(ii) Consumption of that type of alcoholic beverage is
 authorized by the ordinance creating the entertainment zone.

(iii) Open alcohol containers only leave the premises during the hours allowed by the ordinance establishing the entertainment zone.

(iv) Patrons with open containers exit the premises directly into an entertainment zone.

(v) All alcoholic beverages in the entertainment zone are purchased only at a licensed premises located within the entertainment zone.

(vi) The premises expressly prohibits open containers or closed containers of alcoholic beverages acquired outside their premises.

(vii) Delivery of alcoholic beverages to consumers
 within the entertainment zone by the licensee or by any third-party delivery service is expressly prohibited unless the delivery is to a residential building or private business that is not a licensee.

(viii) No alcoholic beverages purchased at the licensed premises may leave the premises in an open glass or metal container for consumption in an entertainment zone.

(ix) The licensee annually submits their notice of intent to participate in an open container entertainment zone to the department.

(B) This paragraph does not require a licensee to sell any alcoholic beverage for consumption off the premises within an entertainment zone.

(C) Licensees whose
 privileges are restricted due to operating conditions or other statutory restrictions may be prohibited from exercising entertainment zone privileges that are contrary to their operating conditions. For purposes of this paragraph, any restrictions on the exercise of off-sale privileges shall not apply to the removal of open alcoholic beverages from the licensed premises for consumption in the entertainment zone.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, licensed beer manufacturers and holders of out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificates may be issued and may hold retail package off-sale beer and wine licenses. Alcoholic beverage products sold at or from the off-sale premises that are not produced and bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the beer manufacturer shall be purchased by the beer manufacturer only from a
 licensed wholesaler.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a licensed beer manufacturer may manufacture cider or perry at the licensed premises of production and may sell cider or perry to any
 licensee authorized to sell wine. For purposes of this subdivision, “cider” and “perry” have the meanings provided in Section 4.21(e)(8) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations. This subdivision does not alter or amend the classification of cider or perry as wine for any purpose other than that provided by this section.

(d) A beer manufacturer may also have upon the licensed premises, or on premises owned by the manufacturer that are contiguous to the licensed premises and are operated by and for the manufacturer all beers and wines, regardless of source, for sale or service only to guests during private events or private functions not open to the general public. Alcoholic beverage products sold at the premises that are not produced and bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the beer manufacturer shall be
 purchased by the beer manufacturer only from a licensed wholesaler. All alcoholic beverages sold or served shall be produced by a licensee authorized to manufacture the product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 869, Sec. 2.   (SB 969)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23357.1.

An out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate authorizes the shipment of beer manufactured without this state to licensed importers within this state. Beer manufactured without this state, but not beer manufactured without the United States, may only be obtained by a licensed importer within this state from the holder of an active out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate. Only one out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate may be issued to any one beer manufacturer.

A California beer manufacturer with a license in good standing in this state may ship into this state beer which was manufactured at plants out of this state
 without holding an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

23357.2.

(a) An out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate may be issued by the department upon the written undertaking and agreement by the applicant:

(1) That it and its agents and all agencies within this state controlled by it shall comply with all laws of this state and all rules of the department with respect to the sale of alcoholic beverages, including, but not limited to, Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000) of Division 9, and Section 25509, to the same extent as licensees.

(2) That it shall make available, both in California and outside the state, for inspection and copying by the department, all books, documents, and records, located both within and without this state, which are pertinent
 to the activities of the applicant, its agents and agencies within this state controlled by it, in connection with the sale and distribution of its products within this state.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate for cause in the manner provided for the suspension or revocation of licenses, and after a hearing which shall be held in the City of Sacramento or in any other county seat in this state as the department determines to be convenient to the holder of an out-of-state certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 14.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23357.3.

(a) A beer manufacturer’s license or out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate issued to a manufacturer located within the United States authorizes the licensee to conduct tastings of beer produced or bottled by, or produced or bottled for, the licensee, on or off the licensee’s premises. Beer tastings may be conducted by the licensee off the licensee’s premises only for an event sponsored by a nonprofit organization and only if persons attending the event are affiliated with the sponsor. No beer shall be sold or solicited for sale in that portion of the premises where the beer tasting is being conducted. Notwithstanding Section 25600, the manufacturer may provide beer without charge for any tastings conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” does not include any community college or other institution of higher learning, as defined in the Education Code, nor does it include any officially recognized club, fraternity, or sorority whether or not that entity is located on or off the institution’s campus.

(2) For purposes of this section, “affiliated with the sponsor” means directors, officers, members, employees, and volunteers of bona fide charitable, fraternal, political, religious, trade, service, or similar nonprofit organizations and their invited guests.

(3) For purposes of this section, persons “affiliated with the sponsor” also includes up to three guests invited by persons described in paragraph (2).

(c) The
 sponsoring organization shall first obtain a permit from the department at a fee equal to the fee for a special temporary license for beer and wine, as specified in Section 24045.

(d) The department may adopt rules and regulations as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 15.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23357.4.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an incorporated beer manufacturer’s trade association may conduct beer tastings on behalf of one or more licensed beer manufacturers for public educational purposes. Beer tastings conducted by an incorporated beer manufacturer’s trade association may be conducted for groups of individuals unaffiliated with a sponsoring nonprofit organization, provided that the participants do not exceed 100 in number at any beer tasting event.

(2) Beer shall not be sold or solicited for sale in that portion of the premises where the beer tasting is being conducted. Notwithstanding Section 25600, a licensed beer manufacturer may provide beer without charge to
 an incorporated beer manufacturer’s trade association for any tastings conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Affiliated with the sponsor” means directors, officers, members, employees, and volunteers of bona fide charitable, fraternal, political, religious, trade, service, or similar nonprofit organizations and their invited guests.

(2) “Nonprofit organization” does not include any community college or other institution of higher learning, as defined in the Education Code, nor does it include any officially recognized club, fraternity, or sorority, whether or not that entity is located on or off the institution’s campus. 

(c) The incorporated beer manufacturer’s trade association shall first obtain a permit from the department for each tasting event at a fee equal to the fee for a special temporary license for beer and wine, as specified in Section 24045.

(d) The department may adopt rules and regulations as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 16.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23358.

(a) Licensed winegrowers, notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, may also exercise the following privileges:

(1) Sell wine and brandy to any person holding a license authorizing the sale of wine or brandy.

(2) Sell wine and brandy to consumers for consumption off the premises where sold.

(3) Sell wine to consumers for consumption on the premises.

(4) Sell all beers, wines, and brandies, regardless of source, to consumers for consumption on the premises in a bona fide eating place as
 defined in Section 23038, which is located on the licensed premises or on premises owned by the licensee that are contiguous to the licensed premises and which is operated by and for the licensee. At such a bona fide public eating place, beer, wine, and brandy may be used in the preparation of food and beverages to be consumed on the premises.

(5) (A) Permit consumers to leave the premises with open containers of alcoholic beverages for consumption off the premises within an entertainment zone if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(i) The premises is located within the entertainment zone.

(ii) Consumption of that type of alcoholic beverage is authorized by the ordinance creating the
 entertainment zone.

(iii) Open alcohol containers only leave the premises during the hours allowed by the ordinance establishing the entertainment zone.

(iv) Patrons with open containers exit the premises directly into an entertainment zone.

(v) All alcoholic beverages in the entertainment zone are purchased only at a licensed premises located within the entertainment zone.

(vi) The premises expressly prohibits open containers or closed containers of alcoholic beverages acquired outside their premises.

(vii) Delivery of alcoholic beverages to consumers within the entertainment zone by the licensee
 or by any third-party delivery service is expressly prohibited unless the delivery is to a residential building or private business that is not a licensee.

(viii) No alcoholic beverages purchased at the licensed premises may leave the premises in an open glass or metal container for consumption in an entertainment zone.

(ix) The licensee annually submits their notice of intent to participate in an open container entertainment zone to the department.

(B) This paragraph does not require a licensee to sell any alcoholic beverage for consumption off the premises within an entertainment zone.

(C) Licensees whose privileges are restricted due to operating conditions
 or other statutory restrictions may be prohibited from exercising entertainment zone privileges that are contrary to their operating conditions. For purposes of this paragraph, any restrictions on the exercise of off-sale privileges shall not apply to the removal of open alcoholic beverages from the licensed premises for consumption in the entertainment zone.

(6) Produce spirits of wine and blend those spirits of wine into wine produced by the winegrower or sell those spirits of wine to an industrial alcohol dealer or any person holding a license authorizing the manufacture or rectification of distilled spirits.

(7) Possess and transport brandy for the purpose of storing the brandy to age on the winegrower’s premises.

(b) A winegrower may also have upon the premises all beers, wines, and brandies, regardless of source, for sale or service only to guests during private events or private functions not open to the general public. Alcoholic beverage products sold at the premises that are not produced and bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the winegrower shall be purchased by the winegrower only from a licensed wholesaler.

(c) A winegrower shall actually produce on the winegrower’s licensed premises by conversion of grapes, berries, or other fruit, into wine, not less than 50 percent of all wines sold to consumers on the winegrower’s licensed premises and any licensed branch premises.

(d) The department may, if it shall determine for good cause that the granting of any such privilege
 would be contrary to public welfare or morals, deny the right to exercise any on-sale privilege authorized by this section in either a bona fide eating place the main entrance to which is within 200 feet of a school or church, or on the licensed winery premises, or both.

(e) Nothing in this section or in Section 23390 is intended to alter, diminish, replace, or eliminate the authority of a county, city, or city and county from exercising land use regulatory authority by law to the extent the authority may restrict, but not eliminate, privileges afforded by these sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 295, Sec. 1.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23358.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a winegrower or brandy manufacturer, at his or her licensed premises where the sale of wine or brandy is authorized or permitted, when selling to consumers, may sell only wine or brandy which is produced or bottled by such licensee, or wine or brandy which is produced for or is produced and packaged for such licensee, and which is sold under a brand name owned by such
 licensee. The rights and privileges of a winegrower or brandy manufacturer to be issued and to hold an off-sale beer and wine license for any of his or her licensed premises, or for other premises, shall not in any way be changed or affected, or be construed to be changed or affected, by the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 27.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23358.3.

A wine grape grower’s storage license authorizes the holder to store bulk wine, made from grapes produced by the holder, on the premises of a licensed winegrower and to sell that wine, within this state, to winegrowers, distilled spirits manufacturers, brandy manufacturers, wine blenders, and vinegar producers.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 296, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 17.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23359.

A wine grower’s license also authorizes the manufacture of grape brandy to be used exclusively in the production of wine by its holder on the premises for which issued and also the sale of grape brandy to licensed wine growers to be used exclusively in the production of wine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23360.

Licensed brandy manufacturers, notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, may also sell brandy and wine to consumers for consumption off the premises where sold, and to any person holding a license authorizing the sale of brandy and wine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 750.)
-------------------------------------------

23361.

A person holding a brandy manufacturer’s license may also sell grape brandy, fruit brandy, or spirits of wine to licensed wine growers for use by the latter in the production of wine and the production or manufacturing of alcohol for the United States Government, and beverage brandy for sale to consumers for consumption off the premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 750.)
-------------------------------------------

23362.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, a licensed winegrower or brandy manufacturer may be issued and may hold an off-sale general license or a retail package off-sale beer and wine license. The issuance of these off-sale general licenses shall be subject to the pertinent provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23815) of Chapter 5 of this division. Nothing in this division shall be construed to be retroactive or to affect the right of a licensed winegrower or brandy manufacturer to hold, renew or transfer any off-sale general license held by such licensed winegrower or brandy manufacturer on the 30th day of September,
 1959.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 116, Sec. 2.   Effective May 25, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

23363.

Any licensed manufacturer of distilled spirits originally distilled in this State may sell them to any person holding a license authorizing the sale of distilled spirits.

This section shall not apply to distilled spirits manufacturer licenses issued after the effective date of the amendment of this section enacted at the 1959 Regular Session of the Legislature, and this section shall not apply to manufacturers of distilled spirits who have not regularly and continuously exercised the privileges of this section by sales to retail licensees.

In addition to the rights and privileges granted by
 this section, any person holding a distilled spirits manufacturer license may sell brandy to any person holding a license authorizing the sale of brandy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1588.)
-------------------------------------------

23363.1.

(a) A distilled spirits manufacturer’s license or a craft distiller’s license authorizes the licensee to conduct tastings of distilled spirits produced or bottled by, or produced or bottled for, the licensee, on or off the licensee’s premises.

(b) (1) Distilled spirits tastings may be conducted by the licensee off the licensee’s
 premises only for an event sponsored by a nonprofit organization. A distilled spirits manufacturer shall not sell or solicit sales of distilled spirits at an event. The sponsoring organization shall first obtain a permit from the department.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “nonprofit organization” does not include any community college or other institution of higher learning, as defined in the Education Code, nor does it include any officially recognized club, fraternity, or sorority, whether or not that entity is located on or off the institution’s campus.

(c) Tastings on the licensee’s premises shall be subject to the following conditions:

(1) The total volume of tastings of distilled spirits shall not exceed one and one-half ounces per individual per day.

(2) Tastings shall only include the products that are authorized to be produced or bottled by or for the licensee.

(3) A person under 21 years of age shall not serve tastes of distilled spirits.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 25600, the licensee may provide distilled spirits without charge for any tastings conducted pursuant to this section. The licensee may charge for tastings conducted by the licensee on its licensed premises.

(e) This section shall not relieve the holder of a craft distiller’s license or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s license of any civil or criminal liability arising out of a violation of Section 25602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.   (SB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23363.2.

(a) A distilled spirits manufacturer not licensed in California may designate in writing a California licensee, other than the holder of any retail license, to conduct tastings of distilled spirits produced or bottled by, or produced or bottled for, the manufacturer, off the designated licensee’s premises only for an event sponsored by a nonprofit organization and only if persons attending the event are affiliated with the sponsor. No distilled spirits shall be sold or solicited for sale in that portion of the premises where the distilled
 spirits tasting is being conducted. Notwithstanding Section 25600, the designated licensee may provide distilled spirits without charge for any tastings conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Nonprofit organization” does not include any community college or other institution of higher learning, as defined in the Education Code, nor does it include any officially recognized club, fraternity, or sorority whether or not that entity is located on or off the institution’s campus.

(2) “Affiliated with the sponsor” means directors, officers, members, employees, and volunteers of bona fide charitable, fraternal, political, religious, trade, service, or similar nonprofit organizations and their invited guests. Persons “affiliated with the sponsor” also includes up to three guests invited by
 persons described in this paragraph.

(c) The sponsoring organization shall first obtain a permit from the department.

(d) The department may adopt rules and regulations as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23363.3.

(a) A brandy manufacturer’s license authorizes the licensee to conduct tastings of brandy produced or bottled by, or produced or bottled for, the licensee, on or off the licensee’s premises.

(b) (1) A brandy manufacturer shall not sell or solicit sales of brandy at the event. The sponsoring organization shall first obtain a permit from the department.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “nonprofit organization” does not include any community college or other institution of higher learning, as defined in the Education Code, nor does it include any officially recognized club, fraternity, or sorority, whether or not that entity is located on or off the institution’s
 campus.

(c) Tastings on the licensee’s premises shall be subject to the following conditions:

(1) Tastings of brandy shall not exceed one-fourth of one ounce and shall be limited to no more than six tastes per individual per day.

(2) Tastings shall only include the products that are authorized to be produced or bottled by or for the licensee.

(3) A person under 21 years of age shall not serve tastes of brandy.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 25600, the licensee may provide brandy without charge for any tastings conducted pursuant to this section. The licensee may charge for tastings conducted by the licensee on its licensed premises.

(e) This section shall not relieve the holder of a brandy manufacturer’s license of any civil or criminal liability arising out of a violation of Section 25602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 532, Sec. 1.   (AB 546)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23364.

All provisions of this division relating to the sale and delivery of distilled spirits from distilled spirits wholesalers or rectifiers to on- or off-sale licensees, all provisions of Part 14 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code imposing an excise tax upon the sale of distilled spirits, and all provisions of Part 14 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code relating to distilled spirits excise tax procedure applies to distilled spirits manufacturers when making sales, authorized by this division, of distilled spirits produced in this State to on- or off-sale licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

23365.

Neither a corporation nor a limited partnership required to maintain a register under Section 23405.1 or licensed under Section 23405.2 engaged in the manufacture of distilled spirits shall, directly or indirectly, through affiliates, subsidiaries, or otherwise, distribute distilled spirits to its stockholders by dividend, or to its limited partners by return of capital contribution or share of profits, either by distribution in kind or the granting of purchase privileges. This section does not restrict the sale of alcoholic beverages to persons holding manufacturer's, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent's, rectifier's, or wholesaler’s licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 680.)
-------------------------------------------

23366.

A distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license authorizes any of the following:

(a) The possession of distilled spirits in public or private warehouses.

(b) The exportation of distilled spirits.

(c) The cutting, blending, mixing, flavoring, and coloring of distilled spirits for his own account or for the account of a distilled spirits manufacturer, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, or wholesaler.

(d) Whether cut,
 blended, mixed, flavored, or colored by him, or any other person, the packaging and the sale or delivery of distilled spirits only to holders of distilled spirits manufacturer’s, rectifier’s, or distilled spirits wholesaler’s licenses.

A person need not actually engage in the cutting, blending, or bottling of distilled spirits in order to qualify for a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23366.1.

No distilled spirits manufacturer or any agent thereof shall solicit a consumer to purchase amounts or lots of distilled spirits through a specific retailer.

This section shall not prevent any distilled spirits manufacturer or the agent thereof who holds any license or licenses authorizing sales to consumers from making sales of alcoholic beverages to consumers as permitted by such license or licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23366.2.

An out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate authorizes the shipment of distilled spirits manufactured without this state to licensed importers within this state. Distilled spirits manufactured without this state may only be obtained by a licensed importer from the holder of an active out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate. Only one out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate may be issued to any one distilled spirits shipper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 413.)
-------------------------------------------

23366.3.

(a) An out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate may be issued by the department upon the written undertaking and agreement by the applicant:

(1) That it and its agents and all agencies within this state controlled by it shall comply with all laws of this state and all rules of the department with respect to the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(2) That it shall make available, both in California and outside the state, for inspection and copying by the department, all books, documents, and records, located both within and without the state, which are pertinent to the activities of the applicant, its agents and agencies within this state controlled by it, in connection with the sale and
 distribution of its products within this state.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke an out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate for cause in the manner provided for the suspension and revocation of licenses, and after a hearing which shall be held in the City of Sacramento or in such other county seat in the state as the department determines to be convenient to the holder of an out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 18.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23366.5.

A winegrower’s license, brandy manufacturer’s license, California winegrower’s agent’s license, beer and wine wholesaler’s license or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license also authorizes the solicitation of orders for wine or brandy, or both, which are produced or manufactured in this state and which the licensee is authorized to sell by his license for and on behalf of any licensee for the sale to other licensees of such wine or brandy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

23367.

A still license authorizes the person to whom issued to own or possess the number of stills indicated in the license upon the premises for which issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23368.

A rectifier’s license authorizes the person to whom issued to cut, blend, rectify, mix, flavor, and color distilled spirits and wine upon which the excise tax imposed by Part 14 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code has been paid, and, whether so cut, blended, mixed, flavored, or colored by him or any other person, to package, label, export, and sell the products to persons holding licenses authorizing the sale of distilled spirits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

23368.1.

A distilled spirits rectifier’s general license authorizes the person to whom issued to cut, blend, rectify, mix, flavor, and color distilled spirits, and whether so cut, blended, mixed, flavored, or colored by him or any other person to package, label, export, and sell the distilled spirits to distilled spirits manufacturers, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agents, distilled spirits wholesalers, distilled spirits general
 importers, rectifiers, and distilled spirits general rectifiers.

No distilled spirits rectifier’s general license shall be issued to any person who holds an interest, directly or indirectly, in an on-sale or off-sale general license. The number of distilled spirits rectifier’s general licenses which may be issued shall not be limited by the provisions of Section 23820.

A distilled spirits rectifier’s general license may be issued to the same premises for which a manufacturer’s, manufacturer’s agent, importer’s, rectifier’s, or wholesaler’s license has been issued and is in effect whether issued to the same person or another person.

The fee for a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license shall be two hundred seventy-six dollars ($276), which shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 28.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23369.

In order to qualify for a rectifier’s license, a person shall actually be engaged at the time the license is issued or renewed, or within 30 days thereafter, in the bottling of distilled spirits owned by him. The distilled spirits owned by him shall comprise at least 50 percent of the total distilled spirits bottled by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23370.

Nothing in Sections 23368 and 23369 prohibits the issuance of a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license to any person who is engaged in the bottling of distilled spirits owned solely by other manufacturer’s agents, rectifiers, wholesalers, or manufacturers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23371.
